Tennessee statutes. Title 17 Judges And Chancellors
Part 3

Trial Court Vacancy Commission

17-4-301. Establishment — Composition of commission — Information.

There is established as a part of the judicial branch of the state a trial court vacancy commission, referred to in this part as “the commission,” that shall have jurisdiction over all trial court vacancies occurring on or after February 1, 2016. For purposes of making the initial appointments to the commission, the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives are authorized to make appointments on January 28, 2016. The commission shall be composed of eleven (11) members as follows:

Five (5) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the senate. At least three (3) of these members shall be attorneys;

Five (5) members shall be appointed by the speaker of the house of representatives. At least three (3) of these members shall be attorneys; and

One (1) member shall be appointed by joint action of the speaker of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives. This member shall be an attorney and shall serve as chair of the commission.

In order to stagger the terms of the newly appointed commission members, initial appointments shall be made as follows:

One (1) of the initial appointments by the speaker of the senate shall be made for a term of two (2) years;

One (1) of the initial appointments by the speaker of the house of representatives shall be made for a term of two (2) years;

The speakers' joint appointment shall be made for a term of two (2) years;

Two (2) of the initial appointments by the speaker of the senate shall be made for terms of four (4) years each;

Two (2) of the initial appointments by the speaker of the house of representatives shall be made for terms of four (4) years each;

Two (2) of the initial appointments by the speaker of the senate shall be made for terms of six (6) years each; and

Two (2) of the initial appointments by the speaker of the house of representatives shall be made for terms of six (6) years each.

After the initial appointments, the terms for all appointments shall comply with §§ 17-4-305 and 17-4-306.

The administrative office of the courts shall develop and post on its web site downloadable information about the commission suitable for viewing by the general public.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

The Trial court vacancy commission, created by this section, terminates June 30, 2024. See §§4-29-112,4-29-245.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-302. Membership requirements.

Each member of the commission shall be a citizen of the United States, shall be at least thirty (30) years of age, and shall have been a citizen of this state for at least five (5) years immediately prior to appointment.

Each attorney member shall be duly licensed to practice by the Tennessee supreme court.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-303. Exclusions from membership on commission.

No member of the commission shall be a salaried office holder of this state or the United States, nor shall any member of the commission hold any office in any political party or political organization; provided, that members of the national guard and members of any armed forces reserve organization, any district attorney general or an employee of a district attorney general, or any district public defender or an employee of a district public defender shall not be considered as salaried office holders. This subsection (a) shall not apply to any employee of the attorney general and reporter, except the attorney general and reporter and the solicitor general.

Any member of the commission who becomes a salaried office holder of this state or the United States or who accepts any office in any political party or political organization shall by doing so vacate the member's office as a member of the commission.

No member of the commission shall be a registered employer of a lobbyist in this state or a registered lobbyist in this state. Any member of the commission who becomes a registered employer of a lobbyist or a registered lobbyist in this state shall by doing so vacate the member's office as a member of the commission.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-304. Start of term — Rules.

The term of office of each member of the commission shall begin on February 1, 2016.

The commission shall have the authority to promulgate rules in accordance with the Uniform Administrative Procedures Act, compiled in title 4, chapter 5.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-305. Terms generally — Eligibility for reappointment.

Except as otherwise provided in § 17-4-301(b) or § 17-4-306, the term of a member of the commission shall be six (6) years.

Members shall be eligible for reappointment for a successive term.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-306. Vacancy filled as original appointment — Absence from meetings — Vacation of membership.

A vacancy on the commission shall be filled in the same manner as the original appointment for the remainder of the unexpired term.

A member of the commission who has four (4) unexcused absences from commission hearings during the member's term of office must vacate the member's office as a member of the commission.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17; 2019, ch. 166, § 3.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Amendments. The 2019 amendment substituted “A member of the commission who has four (4) unexcused absences from commission hearings during the member’s term of office must vacate” for “Any member of the commission who misses four (4) meetings of the commission during the member's term of office shall by doing so vacate” in (b).

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Acts 2019, ch. 166, § 4. April 18, 2019.

17-4-307. Compensation — Reimbursement for expenses.

Members of the commission shall not receive any compensation for their services but shall be reimbursed for their official travel expenses pursuant to policies and guidelines promulgated by the supreme court.

Subject to budgetary restrictions, the administrative office of the courts shall pay or reimburse the necessary expenses authorized or incurred by the commission in the performance of the duties pursuant to policies and guidelines promulgated by the supreme court.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-308. Vacancies — Governor's appointment of commission nominees — Requirement by
governor for additional nominees — Term of judges herein appointed — Public meeting requirement — Hearings.

After February 1, 2016, when a vacancy occurs in the office of chancellor, circuit court judge, criminal court judge, or judge of any other state trial court of record by death, resignation, retirement, or otherwise, the governor shall fill the vacancy by appointing one (1) of the three (3) persons nominated by the commission. The governor may require the commission to submit one (1) other panel of three (3) additional nominees. Within sixty (60) days following receipt of the additional panel of nominees, the governor shall fill the vacancy by appointing any one (1) of the six (6) nominees certified by the commission.

The term of a judge appointed under this section shall expire on August 31 after the next regular August election occurring more than thirty (30) days after the vacancy occurs.

The commission shall, at the earliest practicable date, hold a public meeting in the judicial district from which the vacancy is to be filled.

Notice of the time, place, and purpose of the meeting shall be given by newspapers, radio news, or television news and by such other means as the commission deems proper.

Any person shall be entitled to attend the meeting and express orally or in writing the citizen's approval of or objections to any suggested nominee for the trial court vacancy. Any licensed attorney may appear and make a statement, oral or written, in support of the attorney's own nomination.

After one (1) public hearing, the commission may hold such additional interviews with the candidates as it deems necessary. The commission shall make independent investigation and inquiry to determine the qualifications of possible nominees for the trial court vacancy and shall endeavor to encourage qualified attorneys to accept nomination and agree to serve if appointed to the trial court vacancy. All hearings, interviews, and meetings of the commission shall be conducted publicly and shall comply with title 8, chapter 44, part 1. Deliberations among the commission members shall occur immediately after the conclusion of the interviews. The commission shall adjourn the public hearing and interviews and deliberate in executive session. The deliberations shall not be open to the public and shall not be required to comply with title 8, chapter 44, part 1. At the conclusion of deliberations among commission members, the commission shall reconvene the public hearing for purposes of voting. When selecting nominees, commission members shall vote anonymously by written ballots, but such ballots shall be collected, announced, and tallied at the meeting by the presiding officer, and a majority of those present and voting shall decide questions. After receiving the commission's panel or panels of nominees, but prior to making an appointment pursuant to subsection (a), the governor shall direct the Tennessee bureau of investigation or other appropriate agencies to perform appropriate financial and criminal background investigations and inquiries of the prospective appointees, and the governor shall review and assess the results of the background investigations and inquiries.

The application for the position of trial judge shall contain an authorization form permitting the commission to request from the board of judicial conduct and the board of professional responsibility any information, records, files, or other documents, whether in an electronic format or written form, that the board maintains on the applicant. Signing the authorization form has the effect of waiving any statutory or common law confidentiality that may attach to those documents.

If an applicant signs the authorization form, upon request of the commission, the board of judicial conduct and the board of professional responsibility shall furnish the commission with all information, records, files, or other documents, whether in an electronic format or written form, that the board maintains on a person who applies to be a candidate to fill a trial court vacancy.

As soon as practicable, and no later than sixty (60) days from receipt of written notice from the governor that a vacancy has occurred, the commission, with the assent of a majority of all the members to which it is entitled under § 17-4-301(a), shall select three (3) persons whom the commission deems best qualified and available to fill the vacancy, and shall certify the names of the three (3) persons to the governor as nominees for the trial court vacancy. However, if the commission is reliably informed that a vacancy is impending for any other reason, then the commission may meet, select such persons, and certify the names of the nominees to the governor prior to actual receipt of written notice from the governor that a vacancy has occurred.

If the judicial district is one (1) of the five (5) smallest judicial districts according to the 2010 federal census or any subsequent federal census, the commission may submit two (2) names to the governor, although the governor may require the commission to submit one (1) other panel of two (2) additional nominees.

At the next regular August election occurring more than thirty (30) days after the vacancy occurs, the qualified voters of the district shall elect a candidate to fill the remainder of the unexpired term or a complete term, as provided in the general election law in title 2; provided, however, the qualifying deadline for candidates to fill the vacancy shall be determined by the date of the vacancy as follows:

If the vacancy occurs on or before the tenth day prior to the regular qualifying deadline, then the regular qualifying deadline shall apply;

If the vacancy occurs after the tenth day before the qualifying deadline but on or before the thirty-eighth day prior to the next regular August election, then the qualifying deadline shall be twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the tenth day after the vacancy is created;

If the vacancy occurs after the thirty-eighth day but on or before the thirty-first day prior to the next regular August election, then the qualifying deadline shall be twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the twenty-eighth day before the election; and

Candidates qualifying under subdivisions (j)(2) and (3) must withdraw no later than twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the third day after the qualifying deadline; however, no candidate shall withdraw after twelve o'clock (12:00) noon, prevailing time, on the twenty-eighth day before the election.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

For tables of population of Tennessee municipalities, and for U.S. decennial populations of Tennessee counties, see Volume 13 and its supplement.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

Attorney General Opinions. Because the General Assembly has not repealed title 16, chapter 21 of the Tennessee Code, and has specifically referred to it and identified it as providing the appropriate procedure for filling the three new judgeships created by S.B. 5/H.B. 10, 110th Gen. Assem. (2018), the Commission should comply with T.C.A. §16-2-512 to the extent possible, even though the Judicial Council established by title 16, chapter 21, no longer exists. OAG 18-21, 2018 Tenn. AG LEXIS 20 (5/24/2018).

17-4-309. Nominees — requirements.

All nominees of the trial court vacancy commission shall be attorneys who are duly licensed to practice law in this state and who are fully qualified under the constitution and statutes of this state to fill the office for which they are nominated.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-310. Appointment by governor when commission fails to provide list of nominees — Expiration of term.

If the trial court vacancy commission does not furnish a list of three (3) nominees to the governor within sixty (60) days after receipt of written notice from the governor that a vacancy has occurred, then the governor may fill the vacancy by appointing any person who is duly licensed to practice law in this state and who is fully qualified under the constitution and statutes of this state to fill the office.

The term of a judge appointed under this section shall expire on August 31 after the next regular August election occurring more than thirty (30) days after the vacancy occurs.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.

17-4-311. Maintenance of records by administrative office of the courts — Notification of time and place of meetings.

The administrative office of the courts shall keep and maintain all records of the trial court vacancy commission as well as furnish the commission with any other secretarial or clerical services or assistance it may require. It is further the duty of the administrative office of the courts to notify all commission members of the date, time, and place of any commission meetings.

Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 17.

Compiler's Notes. For the Preamble to the act concerning an orderly procedure for the appointment, confirmation, and retention of appellate court judges as required by Tennessee Constitution, Article VI, Section 3, please refer to Acts 2016, ch. 528.

Effective Dates. Acts 2016, ch. 528, § 23. January 28, 2016.